lexc/noun/enhufnevek.lexc
LEXICON Possjnull
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§Jnull§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§Jnull§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPnull§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPnull§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPnull§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPnull§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPnull§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPnull§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounhossz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posshossz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Posshossz
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounssz
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possssz;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possssz
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
! párat
LEXICON AddNounatak
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possatak;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Pluratak;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possatak
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Pluratak
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§AA§k    Gen;
                            Gen;


LEXICON AddNounvel
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possvel;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possvel
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Ins:^+cIns^v§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

! aejaje
LEXICON AddNounje
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possje;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possje
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§JJ§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§JJ§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;


LEXICON AddNounoet
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possoet;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possoet
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^öt       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounszolo
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurszolo;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Plurszolo
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddNounek
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurek;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;


LEXICON Plurek
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ek    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON AddNounjeak
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possje;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurak;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Plurak
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^ak    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON Noun2
felvonásos AddNounatak;
LEXICON Noun3
tétemény AddNounssz;
vételi AddNounje;
őrs AddNounoet;
LEXICON Noun
agrártudomány AddNounssz;
akármi AddNounje;
alany AddNounssz;
altalaj AddNounssz;
ami AddNounje;
belhossz AddNounhossz;
belli AddNounje;
bessz AddNounssz;
bibi AddNounje;
bili AddNounje;
bomberdzseki AddNounje;
bárhány AddNounssz;
bébi AddNounje;
bűncselekmény AddNounssz;
cech AddNounje;
cidri AddNounje;
csikóslegény AddNounssz;
csingilingi AddNounje;
deci AddNounje;
delej AddNounssz;
didi AddNounje;
dirndli AddNounje;
dédi AddNounje;
dörej AddNounssz;
düh AddNounvel;
egypár AddNounatak;
egyvalami AddNounje;
engedmény AddNounssz;
faragvány AddNounssz;
fazettaszél AddNounhossz;
fejlettségi AddNounje;
folyamodvány AddNounssz;
fölérendeltségi AddNounje;
függöny AddNounssz;
grüberli AddNounje;
gyapjúmellény AddNounssz;
gój AddNounssz;
határszél AddNounhossz;
havibaj AddNounssz;
hormonkészítmény AddNounssz;
hossz AddNounhossz;
hullámhossz AddNounhossz;
hölgypáfrány AddNounssz;
ilyesmi AddNounje;
intézmény AddNounssz;
járvány AddNounssz;
jövedelmezőségi AddNounje;
kandüh AddNounvel;
kedvezmény AddNounssz;
kiáltvány AddNounssz;
klöpli AddNounje;
kszi AddNounje;
kultúrfölény AddNounssz;
képződmény AddNounssz;
kötelezvény AddNounssz;
külhossz AddNounhossz;
laboreredmény AddNounssz;
lapszél AddNounhossz;
lityi AddNounje;
lény AddNounssz;
lépéshossz AddNounhossz;
maszáj AddNounssz;
mi AddNounje;
mindeneslány AddNounssz;
monokini AddNounje;
másodpéldány AddNounssz;
napközi AddNounje;
neveléstudomány AddNounssz;
növény AddNounssz;
orronverősdi AddNounje;
partizánkülönítmény AddNounssz;
pi AddNounje;
plecsni AddNounje;
posztószél AddNounhossz;
posztózubbony AddNounssz;
pár AddNounatak;
ragadvány AddNounssz;
reggeli AddNounje;
rezsi AddNounje;
rivaldafény AddNounssz;
röfi AddNounje;
sebszél AddNounhossz;
senki AddNounje;
silótakarmány AddNounssz;
spagetti AddNounje;
szegénylegény AddNounssz;
szexi AddNounje;
szipoj AddNounssz;
szálhossz AddNounhossz;
szóló AddNounszolo;
szórvány AddNounssz;
sínpár AddNounatak;
sóskifli AddNounje;
sörény AddNounssz;
tartomány AddNounssz;
tepsi AddNounje;
termőtalaj AddNounssz;
testhossz AddNounhossz;
toronyhifi AddNounje;
társadalomtudomány AddNounssz;
tűzszekrény AddNounssz;
valami AddNounje;
videoállomány AddNounssz;
vigyázz AddNounhossz;
vándorpatkány AddNounssz;
vízibicikli AddNounje;
vízipáfrány AddNounssz;
zuhany AddNounssz;
áradmány AddNounssz;
éjjeliedény AddNounssz;
életteli AddNounje;
óhaj AddNounssz;
örökségi AddNounje;
összhossz AddNounhossz;
úrilány AddNounssz;
úthossz AddNounhossz;
útszél AddNounhossz;
őrs AddNounoet;
Béci AddNounje;
Eszti AddNounje;
Eörs AddNounoet;
Heni AddNounje;
Kriszti AddNounje;
Méri AddNounje;
Stefi AddNounje;
Viki AddNounje;
Örs AddNounoet;
Agyagosszergény AddNounssz;
Alsóörs AddNounoet;
Alsóőrs AddNounoet;
Badacsonyörs AddNounoet;
Bezi AddNounje;
Budaörs AddNounoet;
Demény AddNounssz;
Drágszél AddNounhossz;
Drávacsehi AddNounje;
Felsőörs AddNounoet;
Geszti AddNounje;
Harkakötöny AddNounssz;
Kereki AddNounje;
Kisberény AddNounssz;
Kővágóörs AddNounoet;
Lőrinci AddNounje;
Mezőörs AddNounoet;
Némedi AddNounje;
Perőcsény AddNounssz;
Püski AddNounje;
Szatmárnémeti AddNounje;
Sümegcsehi AddNounje;
Tarnaörs AddNounoet;
Tiszaörs AddNounoet;
Tétény AddNounssz;
Vejti AddNounje;
Vörs AddNounoet;
Őcsény AddNounssz;
Mississippi AddNounje;
Alvinczi AddNounjeak;
Augustini AddNounjeak;
Bánhidi AddNounjeak;
Chiovini AddNounjeak;
Corodini AddNounjeak;
Foltényi AddNounjeak;
Giovannini AddNounjeak;
Gálcsiki AddNounjeak;
Kaminski AddNounjeak;
Komarnicki AddNounjeak;
Koszeghi AddNounjeak;
Kubinyi AddNounjeak;
Ladovéri AddNounjeak;
Ladányi AddNounjeak;
Lamborghini AddNounjeak;
Lubomirski AddNounjeak;
Majthényi AddNounjeak;
Marsigli AddNounjeak;
Mazzantini AddNounjeak;
Mitsubishi AddNounjeak;
Morinyi AddNounjeak;
Morosini AddNounjeak;
Naményi AddNounjeak;
Pertorini AddNounjeak;
Perényi AddNounek;
Plotényi AddNounjeak;
Poldini AddNounjeak;
Ragettli AddNounjeak;
Rubinyi AddNounjeak;
Sebestény AddNounssz;
Szmolényi AddNounjeak;
Szvorényi AddNounjeak;
Törs AddNounoet;
Uffizi AddNounjeak;
Vághidi AddNounjeak;
